Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.250

Federal funding programs, opportunities—Secretary's duty to comply.

The secretary may adopt rules and policies as necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funding programs and opportunities and to facilitate state and federal cooperation in programs under the department's jurisdiction. The secretary shall ensure that any internal reorganization carried out under the terms of this chapter complies with prerequisites for the receipt of federal funding for the various programs under the department's control. When interpreting any department-related section or provision of law susceptible to more than one interpretation, the secretary shall construe that section or provision in the manner most likely to comply with federal laws and rules entitling the state to receive federal funds for the various programs of the department. If any law or rule dealing with the department is ruled to be in conflict with federal prerequisites to the allocation of federal funding to the state, the department, or its agencies, the secretary shall declare that law or rule inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

[ 1998 c 272 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—Effective date—1998 c 272: See notes following RCW 18.20.230.